Massachusetts, session 194th, H444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The second paragraph of section 51 of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby
amended by adding the following sentences:- A dental hygienist, under the direct supervision of
a supervising dentist, may administer botulinum toxins and or dermal fillers, provided they have
received the same prescribed additional training in the administration of botulinum toxins and or
dermal fillers as that of a dentist and approved by the board. A dental hygienist shall not
administer botulinum toxins and or dermal fillers independently of a dentist.
of 1